hr-HR: Preporučena uporaba: Komercijalna; Industrijska; Stambena; Univerzalna; Ostalo
ja: 推奨用途: 業務用; 産業; 住宅; ユニバーサル; その他
fr: Utilisation recommandée: Commercial; Industriel; Résidentiel; Universel; Autre
sl-SI: Priporočena uporaba: Komercialno; Industrijska; Stanovanjska; Univerzalno; Drugo
pt-PT: Uso recomendado: Comercial; Industrial; Residencial; Universal; Outro
pl: Zalecane zastosowanie: Commercial; Przemysłowy; Budownictwo mieszkalne; Uniwersalny; Inne
cs: Doporučené použití: Komerční; Průmyslový; Obytný; Univerzální; Jiné
it: Uso consigliato: Commerciale; Industriale; Residenziale; Universale; Altro
sv: Rekommenderad användning: Kommersiell; Industriell; Bostads; Universell; Övrigt
zh-CN: 推荐用途: 商业; 工业; 住宅; 通用; 其他
hu: Javasolt használat: Kereskedelmi; Ipari; Lakossági; Általános; Egyéb
nl: Aanbevolen gebruik: Commercieel; Industrieel; Residentieel; Universeel; Andere
fi: Suositeltu käyttötapa: Kaupallinen; Teollinen; Asuin; Yleinen; Muu
de: Anwendungsempfehlung: Kommerziell; Industriell; Wohnen; Universell; Sonstiges
ro-RO: Utilizare recomandată: Comercial; Industrial; Rezidențial; Universal; Altele
ko: 권장 용도: 상업용; 인더스트리얼; 주거용; 범용; 기타
bg-BG: Препоръчителна употреба: Търговски; Индустриални; Жилищни; Универсален; Други
da: Anbefalet brug: Kommerciel; Industri; Beboelse; Universal; Andet
ru: Рекомендуемое применение: Коммерческий; Промышленный; Жилой; Универсальный; Другой
th: การใช้งานที่แนะนำ: เชิงพาณิชย์; อุตสาหกรรม; ที่อยู่อาศัย; อเนกประสงค์; อื่นๆ
en: Recommended use: Commercial; Industrial; Residential; Universal; Other
pt-BR: Uso recomendado: Comercial; Industrial; Residencial; Universal; Outro
zh-TW: 建議用途: 商業; 工業; 住宅; 通用; 其他
lt-LT: Rekomenduojama paskirtis: Komercinis; Pramoninis; Gyvenamasis; Universalus; Kita
vi: Mục đích sử dụng được khuyến cáo: Thương mại; Công nghiệp; Dân cư; Phổ biến; Khác
el: Συνιστώμενη χρήση: Εμπόριο; Βιομηχανικό; Οικιακή; Universal; Άλλο
nb: Anbefalt bruk: Kommersiell; Industriell; Bolig; Universal; Annet
sk-SK: Odporúčané použitie: Komerčný; Priemyselný; Obytný; Univerzálny; Iné
es: Uso recomendado: Comercial; Industrial; Residencial; Universal; Otros
tr: Önerilen Kullanım: Ticari; Endüstriyel; Yerleşim; Her türden mekana uygun; Diğer